California statutes. Education Code
(d) (1) The department may adopt, and as necessary revise, guidelines in accordance with this section at a publicly noticed meeting if the department complies with all of the following:

(A) Provides an opportunity
 for public comment at the meeting.

(B) Provides written public notice of a meeting at least 30 days before the meeting at which the guideline to be adopted will be considered or approved.

(C) For a substantive revision of the guidelines, the department provides written notice of a meeting at least 15 days before the meeting at which the revision will be considered or approved.

(2) The adoption or revision of guidelines pursuant to this subdivision is exempt from Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code until July 1, 2023.

(e) The department shall review available evidence-based research, studies, and survey findings with school food authorities and school food workers, or their
 representatives, to make a recommendation for the amount of time that is adequate for a pupil to eat a school meal, including, but not limited to, the steps necessary to ensure that a pupil has adequate time to eat school meals that are served pursuant to this section and examining the role that breakfast in the classroom and other innovative breakfast models can play in supporting adequate time to eat. These recommendations shall be made public on the department’s internet website on or before June 30, 2025.

(f) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), a school district, county office of education, or charter school that offers independent study, pursuant to Article 5.5 (commencing with Section 51744) of Chapter 5 of Part 28, shall meet the requirements of this section for any pupil on any schoolday that the pupil is scheduled for educational activities, as defined in Section 49010, lasting two or more hours, at a schoolsite, resource center, meeting
 space, or other satellite facility. Pupils who are present during established meal times shall have a nutritionally adequate breakfast and nutritionally adequate lunch made available.

(g) The chartering authority shall, upon request by a charter school and to the extent feasible within existing resources, provide technical assistance to the charter school in implementing this section.

(h) A charter school may enter into a partnership with an existing school food authority for the purposes of implementing this section.

(i) The chartering authority shall, upon request by a new charter school, contract with a charter school to make available a nutritionally adequate school breakfast and a nutritionally adequate school lunch until the charter school is an approved school food authority or until July 1 of the school year
 after the charter school becomes operational, whichever occurs first. The contract shall not exceed the actual costs to provide meals to the charter school, including, but not limited to, additional staffing costs and delivery of meals to the schoolsite, that are not covered by federal or state meal reimbursement.

(j) To comply with subdivision (a), a school district, county office of education, or charter school may use funds made available through any federal or state program the purpose of which includes the provision of meals to a pupil, including the federal School Breakfast Program, the federal National School Lunch Program, the federal Summer Food Service Program, the federal Seamless Summer Option, or the state meal program, or may do so at the expense of the school district, county office of education, or charter school.

(k) For purposes of this section, the following
 definitions apply:

(1) (A) “Nutritionally adequate breakfast” is one that qualifies for reimbursement under the most current meal pattern for the federal School Breakfast Program, as defined in Section 220.8 of Title 7 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(B) Beginning December 31, 2027, excluding foods provided by the United States Department of Agriculture (USDA) Foods in Schools program, a “nutritionally adequate breakfast” does not contain any of the following substances:

(i) Blue 1 (CAS 3844-45-9).

(ii) Blue 2 (CAS 860-22-0).

(iii) Green 3 (CAS 2353-45-9).

(iv) Red 40 (CAS 25956-17-6).

(v) Yellow 5 (CAS 1934-21-0).

(vi) Yellow 6 (CAS 2783-94-0).

(C) Beginning July 1, 2035, a “nutritionally adequate breakfast” does not include either of the following:

(i) Restricted school foods, as defined pursuant to Section 104662 of the Health and Safety Code.

(ii) Ultraprocessed foods of concern, as defined pursuant to Section 104662 of the Health and Safety Code.

(2) (A) “Nutritionally adequate lunch” is one that qualifies for reimbursement under the most current meal pattern for the federal National School Lunch Program, as defined in Section 210.10 of Title 7 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(B) Beginning December 31, 2027, excluding foods provided by the United States Department of Agriculture (USDA) Foods in Schools program, a “nutritionally adequate lunch” does not contain any of the following substances:

(i) Blue 1 (CAS 3844-45-9).

(ii) Blue 2 (CAS 860-22-0).

(iii) Green 3 (CAS 2353-45-9).

(iv) Red 40 (CAS 25956-17-6).

(v) Yellow 5 (CAS 1934-21-0).

(vi) Yellow 6 (CAS 2783-94-0).

(C) Beginning July 1, 2035, a “nutritionally adequate lunch” does not include either of the following:

(i) Restricted school foods, as defined pursuant to Section 104662 of the Health and Safety Code.

(ii) Ultraprocessed foods of concern, as defined pursuant to Section 104662 of the Health and Safety Code.

(3) “Schoolday” means any day that pupils in kindergarten or any of grades 1 to 12, inclusive, are present at a schoolsite or school facility for purposes of instruction or educational activities, as defined in Section 49010, including, but not limited to, pupil attendance at minimum days, state-funded preschool, transitional kindergarten, summer school including incoming kindergarten pupils, extended school year days, school-sponsored field trips, independent study when a pupil is onsite during the schoolday, and Saturday school sessions.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 467, Sec. 6.   (AB 1264)   Effective January 1, 2026.   Section conditionally operative as prescribed by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

49503.

School district funds may also be used for the purchase of school meals for pupils, as provided in Sections 49500 and 49501.5.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 600, Sec. 7.   (SB 348)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

49504.

Each official and department of the state having charge of the administering of funds for the relief of indigents may contribute and pay any of the funds subject to his disposal to any school district within the state, to be used by the district for the purchase of school meals for needy pupils. Every county, city and county, and city within the state may pay any of its funds available for the relief of indigents to any school district, within or partly within the county, city and county, and city for this purpose.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

49505.

(a) Any school district or county office of education participating in the National School Lunch Program that provides a meal to a pupil rendered homeless by a state or federally declared disaster may receive reimbursement equal to the combined state and federal free rate, regardless of the pupil’s eligibility for free meals. It is the intent of the Legislature to ensure that pupils who are not eligible for free meals be considered for inclusion in the meal program when their families are temporarily unable to provide adequate meals for them due to the effects of a natural disaster. It is the intent of the Legislature that the reimbursement for these children be on a temporary basis.

(b) Any school district or county office of education participating in the National School Lunch Program which is unable to meet the meal component requirement of the state meal program because of a state or federally declared disaster is exempted from serving all required meal components and may be reimbursed at the combined state and federal rates as if the meal component requirements had been met.

(c) The State Department of Education may provide a school district or county office of education participating in the National School Lunch Program which has been temporarily closed as a result of a state or federally declared disaster a reimbursement equal to the average daily participation times the average combined state and federal reimbursement rate received by the entity in the month prior to the closure, times the number of days the entity is closed to pay for salaries and other fixed expenses of child nutrition programs.

(d) The State Department of Education shall make reimbursements pursuant to subdivision (a), (b), or (c) to school districts and county offices of education participating in the National School Lunch Program from money appropriated from the General Fund for that purpose. Requests for those reimbursements shall be subject to the review and approval of the State Department of Education. Any funds provided for the purposes of this section shall be in lieu of state reimbursement for child nutrition programs.

(e) All school districts and county offices of education participating in the National School Lunch Program that apply for exemptions and allowances pursuant to subdivision (c) shall demonstrate conformity with any applicable procedures required in the Disaster Relief Act of 1974, P.L. 93-288, as amended by P.L. 100-707. The State Department of Education shall ensure that applicants for relief under subdivision (c) have followed those procedures.

(f) For purposes of this section, “state or federally declared disaster” means only a state or federally declared disaster that occurs on or after the effective date of this section.

(g) Moneys in the Disaster Response-Emergency Operations Account in the Reserve for Economic Uncertainties may be allocated for the purposes of this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 796, Sec. 2.   Effective September 13, 1990.)
-------------------------------------------

49506.

(a) (1) The department shall work with the State Department of Social Services to maximize participation in the federal Summer Electronic Benefit Transfer for Children (Summer EBT) program established pursuant to the federal Consolidated Appropriations Act, 2023.

(2) The department shall share all data determined by the departments to be necessary to adhere to the requirements of paragraph (1) and Section 18901.57 of the Welfare and Institutions Code.

(b) The department shall follow the federal guidelines and regulations established pursuant to Section 502 of Title IV of Division HH of the Consolidated Appropriations Act, 2023 to maximize flexibility for local
 educational agencies to distribute summer meals through noncongregate distributions.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 600, Sec. 8.   (SB 348)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

49506.5.

A school that participates in the National School Lunch Program or School Breakfast Program shall determine a pupil’s Summer Electronic Benefits Transfer (EBT) eligibility as follows:

(a) For a school that also participates in a special assistance alternative, including the Community Eligibility Provision or Provision 2, for every school year in which annual determinations of eligibility for free and reduced-price school meals is not already required, through a Universal Benefits Application that meets all Summer EBT application and verification requirements established pursuant to Part 292 of Title 7 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(b) For a school that does not participate in a special
 assistance alternative, annually through a School Meals Application that meets all verification requirements established pursuant to Section 245.6 of Title 7 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 8, Sec. 44.   (AB 121)   Effective June 27, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

49507.

(a) In addition to the funds allocated pursuant to Item 6100-488 of Section 2.0 of the Budget Act of 2026, the sum of four hundred million dollars ($400,000,000) is hereby appropriated, for the 2026–27 fiscal year, from the General Fund to the department for grants to local educational agencies to support kitchen equipment, infrastructure, training, and the continued implementation of universal school meals. Funds allocated to eligible local educational agencies shall be encumbered on or before June 30, 2030, and shall be used for any of the following:

(1) Kitchen infrastructure upgrades that will increase capacity for freshly prepared onsite meals using minimally processed, locally grown, and sustainable food, increase a school’s capacity to prepare meals that
 surpass the current nutritional quality of food served through a federal school meal program, or reduce waste, including any of the following:

(A) (i) Cooking equipment, including, but not limited to, electrical support and facility upgrade requirements, combination ovens, dishwashers, steamers, and tilting skillets.

(ii) When acquiring new cooking equipment pursuant to this paragraph, local educational agencies receiving funds are encouraged, to the extent practicable, to acquire energy-saving electric and induction equipment rather than equipment that uses fossil fuels.

(B) Service equipment, including, but not limited to, service lines, point-of-sale systems, and mobile carts.

(C) Refrigeration and storage, including, but not
 limited to, walk-in refrigerators, freezers, blast chillers, and system upgrades.

(D) Transportation of ingredients, meals, and equipment between sites, including, but not limited to, vehicles and equipment to prevent spoilage of food in transit.

(E) The support of infrastructure system needs for items described in subparagraphs (A) to (D), inclusive.

(F) Nutrition planning equipment, including, but not limited to, equipment needed to determine nutritional content of menus and remove ultraprocessed foods of concern and restricted school foods from school meals.

(G) Resources to implement innovative strategies that increase access and participation of the universal school meals program and food assistance for pupils who are or may be experiencing food
 insecurity, and increased coordination with community services providing food assistance.

(2) Staffing and training costs related to implementing universal school meals, including any of the following:

(A) Staffing strategies, including recruitment, retention, training, and professional development for food service staff to increase capacity for freshly prepared onsite meals, which may include training on minimally processed, freshly prepared onsite meals, removal of ultraprocessed foods of concern and restricted school foods from menus, sourcing locally and sustainably grown foods, food preparation, healthy food marketing, reducing food waste, and changing the school lunchroom environment.

(B) Additional compensation for additional work relating to serving universal school meals that may include minimally processed,
 locally and sustainably grown foods, a plant-based or restricted diet food option, or a plant-based milk option.

(3) Procurement of California-grown, whole or minimally processed, sustainably grown food from California producers, plant-based food and milk options, or restricted diet food options for inclusion in reimbursable meals served through the federal National School Lunch Program and the federal School Breakfast Program, as determined by the State Department of Education, in consultation with the Department of Food and Agriculture.

(4) Establishment or expansion of food pantries on schoolsites, which may serve pupils and their family members.

(5) Hands-on food education opportunities that engage pupils and connect the classroom with the cafeteria, including, but not limited to, activities in school gardens, on
 farms, in culinary classes, in settings that celebrate traditional foodways and cultivate food sovereignty, and through other experiential learning pathways.

(b) The department shall award grant funds as allocations to local educational agencies, using criteria established by the department, consistent with this section. The department shall give priority, to the greatest extent possible, in this given order:

(1) (A) Base Allocation Funding: each eligible local educational agency shall receive a base funding amount, to be determined by the department, to be used for any of the purposes specified in subdivision (a).

(B) Priority shall be given to eligible local educational
 agencies that did not receive funds for kitchen infrastructure or training pursuant to Section 12 of Chapter 744 of the Statutes of 2025.

(2) Free or Reduced-Price Meals Pupil Population Allocation Funding: additional funding, if available, shall be allocated to eligible local educational agencies serving high populations of pupils who are eligible for free or reduced-price meals, as defined in Section 42238.01.

(3) Additional funding, if available, shall be provided based on the total number for National School Lunch Program meals served from a given time period, to be determined by the State Department of Education.

(c) (1) As a condition of receiving funding pursuant to this section, a local educational agency shall provide a progress report and final report to the department, to be made
 available to other state agencies upon request. The final report shall be submitted on or before June 30, 2031, and include both of the following, as applicable:

(A) How the local educational agency used the funding to improve the quality of school meals, including, but not limited to, eliminating food options containing processed foods, ultraprocessed foods of concern, and restricted school foods, lowering the sodium and sugar levels in meal options, and offering more freshly prepared meal options.

(B) How the local educational agency used the funding to increase capacity for freshly prepared onsite meals using minimally processed, locally grown, and sustainable food.

(2) The department may develop forms or designate existing forms that may be used by local educational agencies to comply with paragraph (1).

(3) To the extent practicable, the department shall allow local educational agencies that have previously received funding for kitchen infrastructure and training to consolidate grant reporting pursuant to this subdivision.

(d) For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:

(1) “Federal school meal program” means the federal National School Lunch Program, the federal School Breakfast Program, or the federal Seamless Summer Option.

(2) “Food service staff” means a person employed on a full-time or part-time basis as a classified school employee by a local educational agency.

(3) “Freshly prepared onsite meal” means food service in which the preparation of meals takes place on a
 daily basis at the site of consumption or in a central kitchen, using whole ingredients in their most basic, minimally processed form, or cooking with both fresh, raw, and whole ingredients and ready-made products.

(4) “Local educational agency” means a school district, county office of education, or charter school participating in the federal School Breakfast Program and the federal National School Lunch Program.

(5) “Nutritious” means, at minimum, foods that align with the federal and state standards for meals served through the federal National School Lunch Program and the federal School Breakfast Program, and as further defined for purposes of Section 49531.

(6) “Restricted school foods” has the same meaning as defined in Section 104662 of the Health and Safety Code.

(7) “Ultraprocessed foods of concern” has the same meaning as defined in Section 104662 of the Health and Safety Code.

(e) (1) For purposes of making the computations required by Section 8 of Article XVI of the California Constitution, three hundred million dollars ($300,000,000) of the amount appropriated in subdivision (a) shall be deemed to be “General Fund revenues appropriated for school districts,” as defined in subdivision (c) of Section 41202, for the 2025–26 fiscal year, and included within the “total allocations to school districts and community college districts from General Fund proceeds of taxes appropriated pursuant to Article XIIIB,” as defined in subdivision (e) of Section 41202, for the 2025–26 fiscal year.

(2) For purposes of making the computations required
 by Section 8 of Article XVI of the California Constitution, one hundred million dollars ($100,000,000) of the amount appropriated in subdivision (a) shall be deemed to be “General Fund revenues appropriated for school districts,” as defined in subdivision (c) of Section 41202, for the 2026–27 fiscal year, and included within the “total allocations to school districts and community college districts from General Fund proceeds of taxes appropriated pursuant to Article XIIIB,” as defined in subdivision (e) of Section 41202, for the 2026–27 fiscal year.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 250, Sec. 20.   (SB 133)   Effective September 18, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 9. Nutrition [49510. - 49520.]

49510.

This article shall be known and may be cited as the Duffy-Moscone Family Nutrition Education and Services Act of 1970.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

49511.

It is the intent of this article to establish an ongoing program to assure that the nutritional requirements of pupils in receipt of public assistance are enhanced by a pervasive program of food supplementation while they are attending school.

It is the intent of the Legislature that the program established by this article shall in fiscal years subsequent to the year in which this article is enacted be funded according to customary budgetary procedures.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

49512.

(a) The State Department of Education shall establish a statewide program to provide nutritious meals at school for pupils and shall enter into an agreement with the United States Department of Health and Human Services, the United States Department of Education, or the United States Department of Agriculture in order to implement the provisions of this article.

(b) Funds shall be allocated to school districts in accordance with subdivision (b) of Section 49501.5. Determination with respect to the annual income of any household shall be made solely on the basis of an affidavit executed in such form as the United States Secretary of Agriculture may prescribe by an adult member of such household. The income poverty guidelines
 to be used for any fiscal year shall be those prescribed by the United States Secretary of Agriculture as of July 1 of each year.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 600, Sec. 9.   (SB 348)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

49513.

To the extent that school districts have an operational program of school meals for pupils, the program authorized by this article shall be integrated with such existing service.

In order to extend the program to those pupils attending schools which do not operate a school lunch program and are unable or unwilling to provide meals required by this article, contracts shall be entered into with nonprofit organizations, other public agencies or proprietary agencies. In making such contracts, special consideration shall be given to utilizing the Business Enterprises Program for the Blind established under Article 5 (commencing with Section 19625) of Chapter 6 of Part 2 of Division 10 of the Welfare and Institutions Code. Such contracts shall be negotiated, approved and supervised by the Department of Education and terminated as soon as feasible upon certification by the Department of Education that the local school district or school is able and willing to establish a food service program.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 825, Sec. 22.   Effective October 9, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

49515.

Programs established under this article shall, to the extent feasible and practicable, include provisions for the use of parents of needy pupils in the planning, preparation and serving of meals at school, in order to provide practical experience and training for such parents as part of the educational component of public social services. It is the intent of the Legislature that necessary formal training for such purposes shall, to the maximum extent feasible, be provided under the work incentive programs established under Division 2 (commencing with Section 5000) of the Unemployment Insurance Code.

The use of volunteers in the planning, preparation and serving of school meals and nutritional supplements under this article shall also be encouraged in order to enlist the good will of the community toward the success of this program, and in order to reduce program costs.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

49518.

To the extent that available funds are insufficient to provide services under the program established by this article to all pupils defined as eligible, the following priorities for the provision of such services shall be observed by the Department of Education:

(a) First priority for services shall go to pupils within the category of children described in Section 11202 of the Welfare and Institutions Code.

(b) Second priority shall go to pupils eligible for social services only under Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 11200) of Part 3 of Division 9 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, and among such category of pupils the order of priorities shall decline progressively according to the age of the pupils, with the youngest pupils receiving the highest priority.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

49519.

Each meal provided under this article shall include an appropriate serving of milk; provided, that the provisions of this section shall not be mandatory in the case of demonstration projects conducted pursuant to Section 49514.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

49520.

Notice of the availability of the program prescribed by this article shall be given pursuant to Section 48980.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 975, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 10. Child Nutrition Act of 1974 [49530. - 49536.]

49530.

(a) The Legislature finds that (1) the proper nutrition of children is a matter of highest state priority, and (2) there is a demonstrated relationship between the intake of food and good nutrition and the capacity of children to develop and learn, and (3) the teaching of the principles of good nutrition in schools is urgently needed to assist children at all income levels in developing the proper eating habits essential for lifelong good health and productivity.

(b) It is the policy of the State of California that no child shall go hungry at school or a child development program and that schools and child development programs conducted pursuant to Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 8200) of Part 6 of Division 1 of Title 1 have an obligation to provide for the nutritional needs and nutrition education of all pupils during the schoolday and all children receiving child development services.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

49530.5.

As used in this article, “child nutrition entity” means any school district, county superintendent of schools, child development program operated pursuant to Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 8200) or Chapter 2.5 (commencing with Section 8400) of Part 6 of Division 1 of Title 1, local agency, private school, or parochial school, or any other agency which qualifies for federal aid under the federal school lunch program or the federal child nutrition program prescribed, respectively, by Chapter 13 (commencing with Section 1751) and Chapter 13A (commencing with Section 1771) of Title 42 of the United States Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1041.)
-------------------------------------------

49531.

(a) A school district, county superintendent of schools, or charter school may apply to the department for all available federal and state funds that they are eligible for so that a nutritionally adequate breakfast and lunch may be made available to pupils each schoolday at each schoolsite or school facility where pupils are present during the schoolday and to children receiving child development services. A school district, county superintendent of schools, or charter school that receives state funds pursuant to this article shall make available breakfasts and lunches in accordance with state and federal guidelines. If an entity’s school meal service is not in compliance with state and federal guidelines or regulations, or both, including noncompliance determined during administrative reviews, procurement reviews, or complaint
 investigations conducted by the department, the entity shall be ineligible for state meal reimbursement.

(b) (1) A nutritionally adequate breakfast, for the purposes of this article, is one that qualifies for reimbursement under the most current meal pattern for the federal School Breakfast Program, as defined in Section 220.8 of Title 7 of the Code of Federal Regulations and paragraph (2). A nutritionally adequate lunch for purposes of this article is one that qualifies for reimbursement under the most current meal pattern for the federal National School Lunch Program, as defined in Section 210.10 of Title 7 of the Code of Federal Regulations and paragraph (2).

(2) A nutritionally adequate breakfast or lunch shall not consist of more added sugar than the amount allowed by the federal School Breakfast Program and the federal National School Lunch Program,
 respectively.

(3) Beginning December 31, 2027, a nutritionally adequate breakfast or lunch, excluding foods provided by the United States Department of Agriculture (USDA) Foods in Schools program, shall not contain any of the following substances:

(A) Blue 1 (CAS 3844-45-9).

(B) Blue 2 (CAS 860-22-0).

(C) Green 3 (CAS 2353-45-9).

(D) Red 40 (CAS 25956-17-6).

(E) Yellow 5 (CAS 1934-21-0).

(F) Yellow 6 (CAS 2783-94-0).

(4) Beginning July 1, 2035, a nutritionally adequate breakfast or lunch, excluding
 foods provided by the United States Department of Agriculture (USDA) Foods in Schools program, shall not include either of the following:

(A) Restricted school foods, as defined pursuant to Section 104662 of the Health and Safety Code.

(B) Ultraprocessed foods of concern, as defined pursuant to Section 104662 of the Health and Safety Code.

(c) (1) If the federal School Breakfast Program and federal National School Lunch Program allow more added sugar or sodium than is recommended by the most recent Dietary Guidelines for Americans, established by the United States Department of Agriculture and the United States Department of Health and Human Services, the State Department of Education shall convene representatives from the California School Nutrition Association and cafeteria workers, or their
 representatives, to work in partnership to provide the following:

(A) Maximum daily added sugar intake recommendations for each grade level commensurate with the American Academy of Pediatrics’ standards for children two years of age or older.

(B) Maximum daily added sodium intake recommendations for each grade level commensurate with recommendations for children and adolescents in the Dietary Guidelines for Americans.

(2) Recommendations pursuant to this subdivision shall encourage the prioritization of foods with higher nutritional density when there is added sugar or sodium in the food.

(d) State reimbursement for meals provided pursuant to this article shall be limited to meals made available to pupils pursuant to Section
 49501.5.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 467, Sec. 7.   (AB 1264)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

49531.1.

(a) The department shall develop and maintain nutrition guidelines for school lunches and breakfasts that are provided pursuant to Section 49501.5 and for all food and beverages sold on public school campuses.

(b) The nutrition guidelines for school lunches and breakfasts, pursuant to subdivision (a), shall be consistent with the requirements for a nutritionally adequate breakfast and a nutritionally adequate lunch, as defined in subdivision (b) of Section 49531.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 600, Sec. 13.   (SB 348)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

49533.

(a) A Child Nutrition Advisory Council composed of 13 members shall be appointed by January 1, 1975, to recommend plans and guidelines for school and child care meal service and nutrition education programs. The members of the council shall be appointed by the Superintendent and shall include one member of the department, one school administrator, one school board member, one school food service director, one school food service supervisor or manager, one classroom teacher, one curriculum coordinator, one nutrition education specialist, one layperson, one child care food program sponsor, one secondary high school pupil, one representative from a recognized parent-teacher organization, and one qualified consultant specializing in nutrition, education, child care, or health and welfare.

 (b) The members shall serve for a term of three years, except the pupil representative, who shall serve a one-year term. Council members shall serve without pay, but shall be reimbursed for authorized travel costs according to established department procedures.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 15, Sec. 46.   (AB 99)   Effective June 27, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

49534.

(a) The department may formulate the basic elements of nutrition education programs for child nutrition entities participating in programs established under this article. Such programs may coordinate classroom instruction with the food service program and may be of sufficient variety and flexibility to meet the needs of pupils in the total spectrum of education, including early childhood, elementary and secondary schools, special education classes and programs, and child development programs.

(b) Nutrition education programs may be maintained on a project approval basis. The state board may establish rules and regulations for nutrition education projects. County offices of education may apply for and receive funds on behalf
 of school districts under their jurisdiction in order to implement projects.

(c) Projects may include, but need not be limited to, innovative ways to coordinate the school meal service program with the nutrition education program; development of community resources for purposes of nutrition education; instructional programs for teachers, parents, food service employees; and training and usage of paraprofessionals to assist the instructional staff.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 666, Sec. 44.   (AB 486)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

49536.

(a) The department shall, before July 1 of each year, prescribe an adjustment in the state meal contribution rates established pursuant to this section for the forthcoming fiscal year. The adjustments shall reflect the changes in the cost of operating a school breakfast and lunch program and shall be made commencing on July 1 of each year. The adjustment shall be the average of the separate indices of the “Food Away From Home Index” for Los Angeles and San Francisco as prepared by the United States Bureau of Labor Statistics.

(b) In giving effect to the cost-of-living provisions of this section, the department shall use the same month for computation of the percentage change in the
 cost of living after July 1, 1975. The same month shall be used annually thereafter. The product of a percentage increase or decrease in the average index and the per meal reimbursement disbursement rate shall be adjusted by the amount of a cost-of-living change currently in effect pursuant to the provisions of this section.

(c) For the 1990–91 fiscal year to the 2012–13 fiscal year, inclusive, the cost-of-living adjustment shall be equal to the percentage change determined pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 42238.1, as that section read on January 1, 2013. Commencing with the 2013–14 fiscal year, the cost-of-living adjustment shall be equal to the percentage determined pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (d) of Section 42238.02.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 47, Sec. 93.   (AB 97)   Effective July 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 10.5. Child Care Food Program [49540. - 49546.]

49540.

The Department of Education shall, on behalf of the state, participate in the federal child care food program prescribed by Public Law 95-627, as codified in Section 1766 of Title 42 of the United States Code, and shall not terminate its participation in such program unless the Legislature authorizes such termination.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 959, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

49541.

The Department of Education is hereby designated as the single state agency to administer the child care food program.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 959, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

49542.

(a) The Department of Education shall administer the child care food program for all eligible, participating entities that provide child development services pursuant to Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 8200) of, and alternative child care programs pursuant to Chapter 2.5 (commencing with Section 8400) of, Part 6.

(b) To the extent permitted by federal law, the child care food program shall be administered as part of such child development services and such alternative child care programs.

(c) The department shall seek the waiver of all federal provisions necessary to reduce fragmentation and duplication in administering the child care food program within such child development services and such alternative child care programs.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 959, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

49543.

The Department of Education shall administer the child care food program for all eligible, participating entities that provide child development services outside of the provisions of Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 8200) of, or child care programs outside of the provisions of Chapter 2.5 (commencing with Section 8400) of, Part 6.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 959, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

49544.

The Department of Education shall maximize the use of available federal funds for the federal child care food program by all eligible entities that provide child development services or child care programs.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 959, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

49545.

The Department of Education shall secure, in a timely manner, federal reimbursement for all eligible, participating entities in the child care food program.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 959, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

49545.5.
